test/src/morphology/N-ceeures_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - čeeuˊres e-stem pöly: # Noun "nit/saivar" - full paradigm
     čeeuˊres+N+Sg+Nom: čeeuˊres
     čeeuˊres+N+Sg+Gen: čeurraz
     čeeuˊres+N+Sg+Acc: čeurraz
     čeeuˊres+N+Sg+Ill: čeurrsa
     čeeuˊres+N+Sg+Loc: čeurrsest
     čeeuˊres+N+Sg+Com: čeurrsin
     čeeuˊres+N+Ess: čeurrsen
     čeeuˊres+N+Par: čeurrsed
     čeeuˊres+N+Sg+Abe: čeurraztää
     čeeuˊres+N+Pl+Nom: čeurraz
     čeeuˊres+N+Pl+Gen: čeurrsi
     čeeuˊres+N+Pl+Acc: čeurrsid
     čeeuˊres+N+Pl+Ill: čeurrsid
     čeeuˊres+N+Pl+Loc: čeurrsin
     čeeuˊres+N+Pl+Com: čeurrsivuiˊm
     čeeuˊres+N+Pl+Abe: čeurrsitää
